Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0833.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 373. If neither the township clerk nor any deputy township clerk shall be is available to perform any necessary functions in connection with registrations, nominations, or elections during the usual or required times for performing such those functions, the township board of that township shall appoint some qualified person who is a registered elector of the township enter into a contract with an individual who is accredited to conduct elections, as provided under this act, and who lives or resides in a city or township located within a reasonable proximity to the township to perform such those functions until such time as the township clerk or a deputy resume their township clerk resumes those duties or until a new township clerk is appointed or elected. Any such person so appointed shall have The contracted individual has all of the powers and authority of a deputy township clerk appointed by the township clerk pertaining to registrations, nominations, and elections. In addition, the contracted individual shall provide a report to the township board at each regularly scheduled township board meeting that occurs while the contract is in effect that summarizes the duties performed by the contracted individual.